Florida, session 2026, HB775.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 627.70171, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
627.70171 Homeowner's insurance premium reductions based
on claim-free periods and mitigation upgrades.—
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb775-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 775 2026
(1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the
"Homeowner Savings and Premium Reduction Act."
(2) LEGISLATIVE INTENT.—It is the intent of the
Legislature that:
(a) Responsible homeowners receive lower property
insurance premiums.
(b) Homeowners who maintain their property in good
condition and avoid making insurance claims be rewarded with
predictable, automatic savings.
(c) Homeowners who file legitimate claims related to major
storms not be penalized.
(d) Homeowners be incentivized to protect their homes by
implementing housing hardening, mitigation upgrades, and
infrastructure improvements.
(e) This legislation improve insurers' transparency and
accountability in how premium reductions are applied.
(3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Claim-free period" means a continuous period with no
filed or paid claims excluding major storm claims.
(b) "Major storm claim" means a claim resulting solely
from a named storm or hurricane as designated by the National
Hurricane Center.
(c) "Mitigation upgrade" means a property improvement,
such as roof reinforcement, shutters, floor barriers, tie-downs,
impact-resistant windows, and reinforced doors, which are
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb775-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 775 2026
approved by the office to reduce the property risk to hazard
events.
(4) MANDATORY PREMIUM REDUCTIONS FOR CLAIM-FREE PERIODS.—
(a) A property insurer issuing, delivering, issuing for
delivery, or renewing a homeowner's insurance policy in this
state on or after July 1, 2026, shall automatically apply
premium reductions for policyholders who maintain a 36-month
claim-free period.
(b) The premium reductions required under paragraph (a)
must be:
1. Statewide, uniform, and actuarially sound.
2. Published annually by the office based on actuarial
review.
3. Applied at policy renewals or, if the 36-month claim-
free period is reached early, before policy renewals.
4. Automatic. An insurer may not require homeowners to
request the reduction.
(c) A homeowner who files only major storm claims remains
eligible for premium reductions. The office shall determine the
premium reduction schedule for such homeowners, except that a
homeowner with one major storm claim in a 36-month claim-free
period is entitled to a full premium reduction.
(d) An insurer may not treat major storm claims in the
same way as preventable or maintenance-related claims.
(5) MITIGATION UPGRADES.—
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb775-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 775 2026
(a) A property insurer issuing, delivering, issuing for
delivery, or renewing a homeowner's insurance policy in this
state on or after July 1, 2026, shall give premium reductions to
homeowners who complete office-approved mitigation upgrades. The
premium reductions for mitigation upgrades are separate from the
premium reductions that are based on claim-free periods.
(b) The office shall create a list of eligible mitigation
upgrades, set premium reduction percentages based on mitigation
upgrades, and maintain a database of approved contractors and
products. Such list, percentages, and database shall be
accessible on the office's website.
(6) ANNUAL REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.—
(a) By January 1 of every year, each homeowner's insurer
shall submit a report on the premium reductions under this
section to the office, the President and Minority Leader of the
Senate, the Speaker and Minority Leader of the House of
Representatives, and the chairs of the legislative committees
with jurisdiction over matters of insurance.
1. The report must include:
a. The number of policyholders eligible for premium
reductions under this section.
b. The number of policyholders receiving premium
reductions under this section.
c. The total dollar value of premium reductions provided.
100 d. The number of major storm claims and the number of non-
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb775-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 775 2026
101 major storm claims.
102 2. The data submitted under subparagraph 1. must be broken
103 down by county and coverage type.
104 (b) The office shall publish, for transparency and public
105 trust, an annual statewide summary report on the data gathered
106 from the reports submitted by homeowner's insurers under
107 paragraph (a).
108 (7) RULEMAKING.—The office may adopt rules to enforce:
109 (a) Premium reduction schedules.
110 (b) Mitigation upgrade standards.
111 (c) Insurer reporting requirements.
112 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb775-00